pt-BR: Tecnologia de correção de sala: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Outro
th: เทคโนโลยีการปรับแก้ห้อง: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Technológia korekcie miestnosti: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Iné
lt-LT: Patalpos korekcijos technologija: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live žemų dažnių valdymas; MCACC; YPAO; Kita
bg-BG: Технология за корекция на стаята: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Други
en: Room correction technology: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Other
nb: Romkorreksjonsteknologi: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Annet
fi: Huoneen korjaustekniikka: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Muu
es: Tecnología de corrección de sala: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Otros
ko: 룸 보정 기술: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; 기타
hu: Szobakorrekciós technológia: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Egyéb
zh-TW: 房間校正技術: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; 其他
ro-RO: Tehnologie de corecție acustică a camerei: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Altele
nl: Ruimtecorrectie technologie: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Andere
it: Tecnologia di correzione della stanza: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Altro
ru: Технология коррекции помещения: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Другой
vi: Công nghệ hiệu chỉnh phòng: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Khác
sl-SI: Tehnologija korekcije prostora: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Drugo
ja: ルーム補正技術: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; その他
de: Raumkorrekturtechnologie: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Tehnologija korekcije prostorije: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Ostalo
el: Τεχνολογία διόρθωσης δωματίου: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Άλλο
da: Rumkorrektionsteknologi: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Andet
tr: Oda düzeltme teknolojisi: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Diğer
pt-PT: Tecnologia de correção de sala: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Outro
pl: Technologia korekcji pomieszczenia: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Inne
sv: Rumskorrigeringsteknik: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Övrigt
fr: Technologie de correction acoustique: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Autre
cs: Technologie korekce místnosti: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; Jiné
zh-CN: 房间校正技术: ARC Genesis; AccuEQ; Audyssey MultEQ; Audyssey MultEQ XT32; DCAC IX; Dirac Live; Dirac Live Bass Control; MCACC; YPAO; 其他